Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. State Boarding Schools.

Sec. 14.16.010.
Establishment of state boarding schools.

The department may establish and operate boarding schools, to be managed in accordance with this chapter. A state boarding school must offer a secondary education curriculum to students enrolled in it, and must provide domiciliary services for students needing such services, if approved by the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 113 SLA 1997)

Sec. 14.16.020.
Operation of state boarding schools.

In the management of state boarding schools, the board shall

adopt a philosophy of education for state boarding schools;

approve the employment of personnel necessary to operate state boarding schools;

establish the salaries and benefits to be paid teachers, excluding administrators;

designate the employees authorized to direct disbursements from the money appropriated for the operation of state boarding schools and for the construction of facilities;

provide custodial services and routine maintenance of physical facilities;

establish procedures for the development and implementation of curriculum and the selection and use of textbooks and instructional materials; the procedures must require a review of textbooks and instructional materials at least once every 10 years;

prescribe health evaluation and placement screening programs for newly admitted students;

establish procedures for staff evaluation; and

establish procedures for providing the training under AS

14.18.060

, AS

14.20.149

,

14.20.680

, AS

14.30.355

,

14.30.356

,

14.30.362

, AS

14.33.100

, AS

18.66.310

, and AS

47.17.022

; the procedures established under this paragraph must include a training schedule that ensures that not less than 50 percent of the total certificated staff employed by the district receive all of the training not less than every two years and that all of the certificated staff employed by the district receive all of the training not less than every four years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 113 SLA 1997; am § 22 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 8 ch 2 SSSLA 2015; am §§
15, 16 ch 54 SLA 2016; am § 6 ch 73 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective October 7, 2015, rewrote (9), which read “provide staff training”.

The 2016 amendment, effective October 26, 2016, in (9), deleted “14.33.127” from the list of sections, substituted “by the district receive” for both “at a school receives and “at each school receives” following “certificated staff employed”.

The 2016 amendment, effective June 30, 2017, in (9), deleted “14.33.127” from the list of sections, and twice substituted “by the district receive” for “at a school receives” or similar.

The 2018 amendment, effective October 28, 2018, in (6), added “the procedures must require a review of textbooks and instructional materials at least once every 10 years;” at the end.

Sec. 14.16.030.
Admission to school.

A state boarding school may admit students who are qualified in accordance with applicable admission standards. Preference for enrollment must be given to students currently enrolled at a boarding school and to students whose educational, emotional, or family requirements warrant attendance in a domiciliary environment.

The board shall prescribe admission standards and procedures by regulation. Admission standards may not discriminate in favor of or against any resident based on race, sex, creed, national origin, or the location or type of residence within the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 113 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For admissions to Mt. Edgecumbe High School, a boarding school, see 4 AAC 33.080.

For special schools, see 4 AAC 33, art. 1.

Sec. 14.16.040.
Status of state boarding school.

A state boarding school is a public school of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 113 SLA 1997)

Sec. 14.16.050.
Applicability of education laws.

The following provisions apply with respect to the operation and management of a state boarding school as if it were a school district:

requirements relating to school district operations:

AS

14.03.030

—

14.03.050

(defining the school term, day in session, and school holidays);

AS

14.03.083

—

14.03.140

(miscellaneous provisions applicable to school district operations);

regulations adopted by the board under authority of AS

14.07.020(a)

that are applicable to school districts and their schools, unless the board specifically exempts state boarding schools from compliance with a regulation;

AS

14.12.150

(authorizing school districts to establish and participate in the services of a regional resource center);

AS

14.14.050

(imposing the requirement of an annual audit);

AS

14.14.110

(authorizing cooperation with other school districts);

AS

14.14.140(b)

(establishing a prohibition on employment of a relative of the chief school administrator);

AS 14.18 (prohibiting discrimination based on sex in public education);

requirements relating to the public school funding program and the receipt and expenditure of that funding:

AS

14.17.500

(relating to student count estimates);

AS

14.17.505

(relating to school operating fund balances);

AS

14.17.500

—

14.17.910

(setting out the procedure for payment of public school funding and imposing general requirements and limits on money paid);

requirements relating to teacher employment and retirement:

AS

14.14.105

and

14.14.107

(relating to sick leave);

AS

14.20.095

—

14.20.215

(relating to the employment and tenure of teachers);

AS

14.20.220

(relating to the salaries of teachers employed);

AS

14.20.280

—

14.20.350

(relating to sabbatical leave provisions for teachers);

AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

(authorizing collective bargaining by certificated employees), except with regard to teachers who are administrators and except that the board may delegate some or all of its responsibilities under those statutes;

AS 14.25 (provisions regarding the teachers’ retirement system);

requirements relating to students and educational programs:

AS

14.30.180

—

14.30.350

(relating to educational services for children with disabilities);

AS

14.30.360

—

14.30.370

(establishing health education program standards);

AS

14.30.400

—

14.30.410

(relating to bilingual and bicultural education).

A person employed as a teacher at Mt. Edgecumbe High School on May 28, 1988, acquires tenure rights in accordance with AS

14.20.150

and

14.20.155

as though the person had been employed by a school district.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 1992; am § 8 ch 113 SLA 1997; am §§ 23, 39 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subparagraphs (a)(1)(G) and (a)(1)(H) were enacted as (a)(1)(H) and (a)(1)(I), respectively.
Relettered in 1998 to reflect the 1998 repeal of former (a)(1)(G).

Cross references. —

For provision suspending the application of the school experience factor authorized by (a)(3)(C) of this section for the period beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2011, and prohibiting the reduction of teachers’ salaries affected by the suspension after the end of the suspension period, see § 1, ch. 18, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For regional resource centers, see 4 AAC 66.

Sec. 14.16.060.
Status of employees.

The employees of a state boarding school are state employees.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1988; am § 9 ch 113 SLA 1997)

Sec. 14.16.070.
Applicability of Public Employment Relations Act.

AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

(Public Employment Relations Act) apply to the employees of a state boarding school.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 1 SLA 1992; am § 10 ch 113 SLA 1997)

Sec. 14.16.080.
Financial provisions applicable to state boarding school.

AS

14.17.440

applies to the calculation of public school funding payable for operation of a state boarding school.

In the transmittals required by AS

37.07.060

—

37.07.062

, the governor shall request amounts for the expenses of construction, rehabilitation, and improvement of the facilities of a state boarding school.

Unless specified otherwise in any appropriation bill, AS

37.25.010

does not apply to an appropriation made for the purposes of (a) of this section.

AS

37.25.020

applies to money appropriated for the purposes of (b) of this section.

For purposes of application for and receipt of federal aid to education, a state boarding school constitutes a local educational agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1988; am §§ 11 — 13 ch 113 SLA 1997; am § 24 ch 83 SLA 1998)